Indiana, session 2026, HB1124.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-41-21.1-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.122-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), Each
person or entity having authority over a school building shall test the
drinking water in the school building before January 1, 2023, the dates
specified in subsection (b) to determine whether the drinking water
equals or exceeds the action level for lead of fifteen (15) ten (10) parts
per billion, or fifteen ten one thousandths (0.015) (0.010) milligram of
lead per liter of water, established by 40 CFR 141.80 as in effect on
January 1, 2020. October 30, 2024.
(b) A person or entity having authority over a school building that
is subject to testing under subsection (a) satisfies the requirement of
subsection (a) with respect to a school building if the drinking water in
the school building:
(1) was tested during the lead sampling program for school
buildings conducted by the Indiana finance authority in 2017 and
2018;
2026 IN 1124—LS 6600/DI 147


(2) is tested in the lead sampling program for school buildings
and child care facilities conducted by the Indiana finance
authority in 2019 and 2020; or
(3) has otherwise been tested for compliance with the standards
set forth in subsection (a) at least once since 2016.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, each person or entity having
authority over a school building shall complete the testing of the
drinking water in the school building not later than the following
assigned date:
(1) School corporations and charter schools with names that
begin with the letters A through H, not later than June 30,
2027.
(2) School corporations and charter schools with names that
begin with the letters I through P, not later than June 30,
2028.
(3) School corporations and charter schools with names that
begin with the letters Q through Z, not later than June 30,
2029.
(c) After calendar year 2022, the drinking water in every school
building located in Lake County shall be tested at least one (1) time in
each period of two (2) calendar years to determine whether the drinking
water equals or exceeds the action level for lead of fifteen (15) parts
per billion, or fifteen one thousandths (0.015) milligram of lead per
liter of water.
(d) If any testing of drinking water conducted under this section
indicates that the presence of lead in the drinking water is equal to or
greater than the lead action level of fifteen (15) parts per billion
established by 40 CFR 141, Subpart I, as in effect on January 1, 2020,
the person or entity having authority over the school building from
which the water was taken for testing shall take action to reduce the
lead levels in the drinking water to less than fifteen (15) parts per
billion.
(c) In conducting the testing required under this section, the
person or entity having authority over a school building shall
follow the federal Environmental Protection Agency's most recent
version of the 3Ts for Reducing Lead in Drinking Water in Schools
and Child Care Facilities.
(d) If a test under this section indicates that the drinking water
of a school building equals or exceeds the action level for lead, the
person having authority over the school building shall follow the:
(1) Indiana finance authority's guidelines; and
(2) national primary drinking water regulations for lead and
2026 IN 1124—LS 6600/DI 147


copper (40 CFR 141 and 40 CFR 142);
for remediation.
(e) Each person or entity having authority over a school building
that is subject to testing under this section shall seek any state and
federal grant money available for lead sampling or testing. including
any money available under the lead sampling program for school
buildings and child care facilities conducted by the Indiana finance
authority.
SECTION 2. IC 16-41-21.1-4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. This section applies to a
superintendent of a school corporation or the equivalent for a
charter school who:
(1) has authority over a school building; and
(2) fails to have the school building's drinking water tested in
the time frame specified in section 3 of this chapter.
The state department shall impose a civil penalty on the
superintendent or the equivalent for the charter school in an
amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the superintendent's or the
equivalent's annual salary for the year in which the superintendent
or equivalent failed to have the school building's drinking water
tested.
2026 IN 1124—LS 6600/DI 147